Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518.131, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Cases given priority for temporary relief. (a) While the proceeding is pending, the court must give priority to scheduling and holding an expedited hearing for temporary relief when a party credibly alleges that: (1) the party has been denied parenting time with a child for 14 consecutive days or more; or (2) the party has been unreasonably denied access to necessary financial resources or support during a pending marital dissolution. (b) A court must hold a priority hearing under this subdivision within 30 days of the party's request. (c) A court must consider credible allegations of domestic abuse, substance abuse, maltreatment findings, or neglect new text begin proven by clear and convincing evidence new text end as a reasonable basis for a party who has denied parenting time to the other partynew text begin , but must hold a priority hearing under this subdivision within 30 days to determine temporary relief if a party has been denied parenting time for 14 consecutive days or morenew text end . (d) If temporary parenting time is ordered, the court may also order temporary child support if requested by the other party.